Utah statutes.
20A-11-104.   Personal use expenditure -- Authorized and prohibited uses of campaign funds -- Enforcement -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  As used in this chapter, "personal use expenditure" means an expenditure that:

(i) (A)  is not excluded from the definition of personal use expenditure by Subsection (2); and

(B)  primarily furthers a personal interest of a candidate or officeholder or a candidate's or officeholder's family, which interest is not connected with the performance of an activity as a candidate or an activity or duty of an officeholder; or

(ii)  would cause the candidate or officeholder to recognize the expenditure as taxable income under federal law.

(b)  "Personal use expenditure" includes:

(i)  a mortgage, rent, utility, or vehicle payment;

(ii)  a household food item or supply;

(iii)  clothing, except for clothing:

(A)  bearing the candidate's name or campaign slogan or logo; and

(B)  used in the candidate's campaign;

(iv)  an admission to a sporting, artistic, or recreational event or other form of entertainment;

(v)  dues, fees, or gratuities at a country club, health club, or recreational facility;

(vi)  a salary payment made to:

(A)  a candidate or officeholder; or

(B)  a person who has not provided a bona fide service to a candidate or officeholder;

(vii)  a vacation;

(viii)  a vehicle expense;

(ix)  a meal expense;

(x)  a travel expense;

(xi)  a payment of an administrative, civil, or criminal penalty;

(xii)  a satisfaction of a personal debt;

(xiii)  a personal service, including the service of an attorney, accountant, physician, or other professional person;

(xiv)  a membership fee for a professional or service organization; and

(xv)  a payment in excess of the fair market value of the item or service purchased.

(2)  "Personal use expenditure" does not mean an expenditure made:

(a)  for a political purpose;

(b)  for candidacy for public office;

(c)  to fulfill a duty or activity of an officeholder;

(d)  for a donation to a registered political party;

(e)  for a contribution to another candidate's campaign account, including sponsorship of or attendance at an event, the primary purpose of which is to solicit a contribution for another candidate's campaign account;

(f)  to return all or a portion of a contribution to a contributor;

(g)  for the following items, if made in connection with the candidacy for public office or an activity or duty of an officeholder:

(i) (A)  a mileage allowance at the rate established by the Division of Finance under Section 63A-3-107; or

(B)  for motor fuel or special fuel, as defined in Section 59-13-102;

(ii)  a meal expense;

(iii)  a travel expense, including an expense incurred for airfare or a rental vehicle;

(iv)  a payment for a service provided by an attorney or accountant;

(v)  a tuition payment or registration fee for participation in a meeting or conference;

(vi)  a gift;

(vii)  a payment for the following items in connection with an office space:

(A)  rent;

(B)  utilities;

(C)  a supply; or

(D)  furnishing;

(viii)  a booth at a meeting or event; or

(ix)  educational material;

(h)  to purchase or mail informational material, a survey, or a greeting card;

(i)  for a donation to a charitable organization, as defined by Section 13-22-2, including admission to or sponsorship of an event, the primary purpose of which is charitable solicitation, as defined in Section 13-22-2;

(j)  to repay a loan a candidate makes from the candidate's personal account to the candidate's campaign account;

(k)  to pay membership dues to a national organization whose primary purpose is to address general public policy;

(l)  for admission to or sponsorship of an event, the primary purpose of which is to promote the social, educational, or economic well-being of the state or the candidate's or officeholder's community; or

(m)  for one or more guests of an officeholder or candidate to attend an event, meeting, or conference described in this Subsection (2).

(3) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall enforce this section by:

(i)  evaluating a financial statement to identify a personal use expenditure; and

(ii)  commencing an informal adjudicative proceeding in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, if the lieutenant governor has probable cause to believe a candidate or officeholder has made a personal use expenditure.

(b)  Following the proceeding, the lieutenant governor may issue a signed order requiring a candidate or officeholder who has made a personal use expenditure to:

(i)  remit an administrative penalty of an amount equal to 50% of the personal use expenditure to the lieutenant governor; and

(ii)  deposit the amount of the personal use expenditure in the campaign account from which the personal use expenditure was disbursed.

(c)  The lieutenant governor shall deposit money received under Subsection (3)(b)(i) in the General Fund.

